Montana, session 2025, SB399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-1-107, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-1-107. Times for holding primary elections -- cost of municipal election -- procedures for
multiple elections on same day. (1) On the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June May preceding a
general election held in an even-numbered year, a primary election must be held throughout the state.
(2) When a primary election provided for in subsection (1) and a school election provided for in 20-
20-105 are held on the same day, the elections must be placed on separate ballots and must be counted
separately, with the ballots from the primary election counted before the ballots for the school election.
(2)(3) On the Tuesday following the second Monday in September preceding a general election held
in an odd-numbered year, a primary election, if required, must be held throughout the state.
(3)(4) The cost of a municipal election must be paid by the municipality."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 399